Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.131

Parental involvement—Measures to evaluate level—Models and practices—Recognition.

There is a sizeable body of research positively supporting the involvement of parents taking an engaged and active role in their child's education. Therefore, the legislature intends to provide state recognition by the center for the improvement of student learning within the office of the superintendent of public instruction for schools that increase the level of direct parental involvement with their child's education. By September 1, 2010, the center for the improvement of student learning shall determine measures that can be used to evaluate the level of parental involvement in a school. The center for the improvement of student learning shall collaborate with school district family and community outreach programs and educational service districts to identify and highlight successful models and practices of parent involvement.

[ 2010 c 235 s 704.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.